DIAGNOSTICS - ABS&HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTERPOWER DI-349
SUPPLY SYSTEM

DI295-06

DTC C1244 /44 Deceleration Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

This sensor detects deceleration on the vehicle. The sensor signal is used in ABS control. If the sensor func-
tions abnormally, the ABS warning light comes on.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

Either of the following (1), (2), (3) or (4) is detected:

(1) The conditionthat ECU terminals GL1 values are -1.5G¢r
less or 1.5 G or more continues for 1.2 secs. or more.

(2) The condition thatthe deceleration sensor terminal VGS * Deceleration sensor
voltageis 4.4V orlessor5.6 Vormore continues for * Deceleration sensor circuit
1.2 secs. or more.

(4) Deceleration sensor signal momentary open occurs for
7 times or more.

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the deceleration sensor circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and
prohibits ABS control and the brake system becomes normal.
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DI-350 DIAGNOSTICS - ABS & HYDRAULIC BRAKE BOOSTER POWER
SUPPLY SYSTEM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between deceleration
sensor and ABS ECU (See page IN-24).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

2 [ Check deceleration sensor (See page DI-312).

NG> Replace deceleration sensor.

@

Check and replace ABS ECU.
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